apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="কেউ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কা/রা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কিছু__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ঐ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="স্বয়ং__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="স্বয়ং"><i>স্বয়ং</i><par n="স্বয়ং__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কারা"><i>কা</i><par n="কা/রা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কেউ"><i>কেউ</i><par n="কেউ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কিছু"><i>কিছু</i><par n="কিছু__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ঐ"><i>ঐ</i><par n="ঐ__prn"/></e>
